en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories > Harmonica Accessories: Harmonica Cases; Harmonica Holders
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ φυσαρμόνικας: Θήκες φυσαρμόνικας; Βάσεις φυσαρμόνικας
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Mızıka Aksesuarları: Mızıka Çantaları; Mızıka Tutucular
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras > Acessórios para harmónica: Estojos para harmónica; Suportes para harmónica
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품 > 하모니카 부대용품: 하모니카 케이스; 하모니카 홀더
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten > Harmonica-accessoires: Harmonicakoffers; Harmonicahouders
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument > Munspelstillbehör: Munspelsfodral; Munspelshållare
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า > อุปกรณ์หีบเพลงเป่า: กล่องหีบเพลงเป่า; ที่ตั้งหีบเพลงเป่า
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品 > ハーモニカ用品: ハーモニカケース; ハーモニカホルダー
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala > Dodatki za harmonike: Kovčki za harmonike; Nosilci za harmonike
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet > Huuliharpputarvikkeet: Huuliharppukotelot; Huuliharpputelineet
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør > Harmonika – tilbehør: Harmonika – tasker; Harmonika – holdere
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов > Аксессуары для губных гармоник: Футляры для губных гармоник; Держатели для губных гармоник
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre harmoniku: Puzdrá na harmoniku; Držiaky na harmoniku
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件 > 口琴配件: 口琴盒; 口琴架
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat > Accesorii pentru armonică: Cutii pentru armonică; Suporturi pentru armonică
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők > Harmonikakiegészítők: Harmonikatokok; Harmonikatartók
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni > Accessori per armonica: Custodie per armonica; Porta armonica
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent > Accessoires pour harmonicas: Étuis pour harmonicas; Supports pour harmonicas
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件 > 口琴配件: 口琴盒; 口琴支架
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala > Pribor za usnu harmoniku: Koferi za usnu harmoniku; Držači za usnu harmoniku
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter > Munnspilltilbehør: Munnspillesker; Munnspillholdere
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi > Phụ kiện kèn acmônica: Hộp đựng kèn acmônica; Dây đeo kèn ac-mô-ni-ca
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství > Harmoniky – příslušenství: Pouzdra na foukací harmoniky; Držáky na foukací harmoniky
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Lūpinių armonikėlių priedai: Lūpinių armonikėlių dėklai; Lūpinių armonikėlių stovai
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Acessórios para gaita: Estojos para gaita; Suportes para gaita
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти > Аксесоари за хармоника: Калъфи за хармоника; Поставки за хармоника
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera > Accesorios para armónica: Estuches para armónicas; Soportes para armónica
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych > Akcesoria do harmonijek: Futerały na harmonijki; Uchwyty na harmonijki
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente > Mundharmonikazubehör: Mundharmonika-Etuis; Mundharmonikahalter